District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-2906

Sale of unwholesome food — Penalty.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 16, 1941, 55 Stat. 808, ch. 587, § 6
May 2, 2002, D.C. Law 14-116, § 8(f), 49 DCR 1945

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3421.
1973 Ed., § 22-3421.

Temporary Amendment of Section

Section 8(f) of D.C. Law 14-55 repealed §§ 22-2901 to 22-2907.
Section 10(b) of D.C. Law 14-55 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(f) of Food Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-128, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7939).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(f) of Food Regulation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-147, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10183).